Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB410.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1510 of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 1510. Issuance and content of driver's license.* * *(a.2) Person with disability RENEWAL USING DEPARTMENTAL RECORDS .-- (1) A person with a disability who renews a driver's license or identification card and meets the qualifications of section 1338(a)(1), (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (7) or (8) (relating to person with disability plate and placard) or is a veteran whose service-connected disability is certified at <--<--12345678910111213141516 100% by the service unit of the armed forces in which the veteran served or by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or who has a service-connected disability of the type enumerated in section 1338 may request that the department issue a driver's license or identification card using the most recent color photograph or photographic facsimile and signature or facsimile of the signature of the person with a disability in the department's possession. ANY OF THE FOLLOWING INDIVIDUALS MAY REQUEST THAT THE DEPARTMENT ISSUE A DRIVER'S LICENSE OR IDENTIFICATION CARD USING THE MOST RECENT COLOR PHOTOGRAPH OR PHOTOGRAPHIC FACSIMILE AND SIGNATURE OR FACSIMILE OF THE SIGNATURE OF THE INDIVIDUAL IN THE DEPARTMENT'S POSSESSION:(I) AN INDIVIDUAL THAT MEETS THE QUALIFICATIONS OF SECTION 1338(A)(1), (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (7) OR (8) (RELATING TO PERSON WITH DISABILITY PLATE AND PLACARD).(II) AN INDIVIDUAL WHOSE SERVICE-CONNECTED DISABILITY IS CERTIFIED AT 100% BY THE SERVICE UNIT OF THE ARMED FORCES IN WHICH THE VETERAN SERVED OR BY THE UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS OR WHO HAS A SERVICE-CONNECTED DISABILITY OF THE TYPE ENUMERATED IN SECTION 1338.(III) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO ENTERS OR IS ON ACTIVE SERVICE IN THE ARMED FORCES OF THE UNITED STATES IN A JURISDICTION OUTSIDE OF THIS COMMONWEALTH OR THE SPOUSE OR DEPENDENT CHILD OF THE INDIVIDUAL WHO RESIDES WITH THE INDIVIDUAL.(2) The department may not issue a driver's license or identification card to the person with a disability INDIVIDUAL if there is no color photograph or photographic 20250HB0410PN1053 - 2 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 facsimile or signature or facsimile of the signature of the person with a disability INDIVIDUAL in the department's possession. The department may require additional information or documentation necessary to comply with this subsection. (3) The department may not issue a driver's license or identification card to the person with a disability INDIVIDUAL if material changes need to be made to the person's INDIVIDUAL'S record, including, but not limited to, change of name or a correction of information such as height or eye color, which shall be made in person.(4) The department may not issue a driver's license or identification card that complies with the act of May 26, 2017 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Pennsylvania REAL ID Compliance Act, to the person with a disability INDIVIDUAL if the color photograph or photographic facsimile of the person with a disability INDIVIDUAL in the department's possession is:(i) over sixteen years of age; or(ii) will be over sixteen years of age at the next four-year renewal interval required by section 1514 (relating to expiration and renewal of drivers' licenses).* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 33 months.20250HB0410PN1053 - 3 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324